District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-544

Costs.

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-100, § 15, 29 DCR 969
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-243, § 20, 44 DCR 1142

History

Prisons and prisoners, employed prisoners, disbursement of wages to, see § 24-231.11.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 3-414.

Prior Codifications

See note to § 4-531.

Emergency Legislation